Arkansas, session 2025, HB1555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-42-103 is amended to read as follows:
14-42-103. Vacancies in municipal offices generally.
(a)(1) Vacancies in municipal offices that are authorized by state law
to be filled by appointment by the city or town governing body require a
majority vote of the remaining members of the governing body.
(2) However, a majority of a quorum of the whole number of the
governing body is required to fill the vacancy.
(b)(1) The governing body may appoint any qualified elector, including
members of a governing body, to fill the vacancy.
(2) However, a member of the governing body shall not vote on
his or her own appointment.
(c) This section does not apply to circumstances prescribed under §
14-43-501(a) or § 14-43-411(a) A vacancy of a municipal office in a
municipality, regardless of the classification or form of government of the
municipality, shall be filled according to one (1) of the following methods:
(1)(A) At the first council meeting after the declaration of the
vacancy, the governing body of the municipality shall elect by a majority
*SSS175*
04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/9/25 HB1555
vote of the governing body of the municipality a person to serve the
unexpired term.
(B)(i) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(ii) of this section, if a vacancy is filled under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section, a majority of the remaining members of the
governing body of the municipality shall fill the vacancy and the governing
body of the municipality may appoint any qualified elector of the
municipality.
(ii) A member of the governing body of the
municipality shall not be appointed to fill a vacancy under this section in
municipalities with a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or more; or
(2)(A) At the first council meeting after the declaration of the
vacancy, the governing body of the municipality shall call a special election
to be held at the next special election date under § 7-11-101 et seq. to fill
the vacant position for the remainder of the term.
(B)(i) If the governing body of a municipality calls for a
special election to fill the vacancy under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section, the governing body may appoint a qualified elector of the
muncipality to serve in the office until the office is filled at the special
election.
(ii) A member of the governing body of the
municipality may be appointed under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section
to serve in the office until the vacancy is filled at a special election.
(b) For a vacancy filled under subsection (a) of this section in a
municipality having a mayor, the appointment is not subject to veto by the
mayor.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-43-304(d), concerning mayors in a city
having a mayor-council form of government, is amended to read as follows:
(d) If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor of a city described in
this section and the unexpired term is more than one (1) year, the vacancy
shall be filled by a special election and special runoff election, if
necessary, as provided in subsection (c) of this section under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-43-310 is amended to read as follows:
14-43-310. Council member ceasing to reside in ward.
04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/9/25 HB1555
If any duly elected council member shall cease to reside in the ward
from which he or she was elected, that person shall be disqualified to hold
the office and a vacancy shall exist which shall be filled as prescribed by
law under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-43-401(b), concerning the office of
mayor generally in a city of the first class, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) In case of the mayor's death, disability, resignation, or
other vacation of his or her office, the city council, by vote of a majority
of all its members, may appoint some other person to act until the expiration
of his or her term or disability if the unexpired term of his or her office
is less than one (1) year. Otherwise, an election shall be ordered in
accordance with the laws of the state vacancy shall be filled under § 14-42-
103.
(B)(2) A removal from the city shall be deemed a vacation
of his or her office.
(2)(A) In all cases in which the unexpired term has one (1) year
or more to run and a special election has been called to fill the vacancy in
the office of mayor, the city governing body may appoint a qualified elector
of the city, including any member of the city council, to serve as acting
mayor until the office is filled at the special election.
(B) A member of the council shall not vote on his or her
own appointment.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-43-411 is amended to read as follows:
14-43-411. Council member vacancy in mayor-council form of government.
(a)(1)(A) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of council member in
a city of the first class having a population of less than twenty thousand
(20,000) according to the most recent federal decennial census, at the first
regular meeting after the occurrence of the vacancy, the city council shall
proceed to elect by a majority vote of the remaining members elected to the
council a council member to serve for the unexpired term vacancy shall be
filled under § 14-42-103.
(B)(i) However, at least a quorum of the whole number of
the city council shall remain in order to fill a vacancy.
(ii) The election by the remaining members of the
04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/9/25 HB1555
city council is not subject to veto by the mayor.
(2) The person elected by the council shall be a resident of the
ward where the vacancy occurs at the time of the vacancy.
(b) When a vacancy occurs in any position of council member in a city
having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or more according to the most
recent federal decennial census, a new council member shall be chosen in the
following manner:
(1) If the unexpired portion of the term of a council member
exceeds one (1) year, at the first regular meeting after the occurrence of
the vacancy, the city council shall proceed to either elect by a majority
vote of the remaining members elected to the council a council member to
serve for the unexpired term or call for a special election to be held in
accordance with § 7-11-101 to fill the vacancy; or
(2) If the unexpired portion of the term of a council member is
one (1) year or less, a successor shall be chosen by a majority vote of the
members of the council the vacancy shall be filled under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 14-43-412 is amended to read as follows:
14-43-412. Vacancies in other elected offices.
(a) In case any office of an elected officer, except council members
of the ward, becomes vacant before the expiration of the regular term, then
the vacancy shall be filled by the city council until a successor is duly
elected and qualified.
(b) The successor shall be elected for the unexpired term at the first
general election that occurs after the vacancy has happened under § 14-42-
103.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 14-44-103(b)(2), concerning the filling of
vacancies for council members in a city of the second class, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) If any duly elected council member shall cease to reside in
the ward from which he or she was elected, that person shall be disqualified
to hold the office and a vacancy shall exist, which shall be filled as
prescribed by law under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 14-44-104 is amended to read as follows:
04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/9/25 HB1555
14-44-104. Vacancy in council member's office.
(a) If a vacancy occurs in the office of council member in any city of
the second class, at the first regular meeting after the occurrence of the
vacancy, the city council shall proceed to elect, by a majority vote of the
council, a council member to serve for the unexpired term.
(b) The election to fill the vacancy under subsection (a) of this
section is not subject to veto by the mayor vacancy shall be filled under §
14-42-103.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 14-44-106 is amended to read as follows:
14-44-106. Vacancy in office.
If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor, marshal, recorder,
treasurer, or recorder-treasurer in any city of the second class, at the
first regular meeting after the occurrence of the vacancy the city council
shall proceed to elect a person to fill the vacancy either by a majority vote
of the council members or by a call for a special election to be held in
accordance with § 7-11-101 et seq under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 14-45-103 is amended to read as follows:
14-45-103. Vacancies.
(a) When a vacancy occurs in the office of council member in an
incorporated town, at the first regular meeting after the occurrence of the
vacancy, the town council shall elect by a majority vote of the town council
a council member to serve for the unexpired term the vacancy shall be filled
under § 14-42-103.
(b) When a vacancy occurs in the office of recorder-treasurer in an
incorporated town, at the first regular meeting after the occurrence of the
vacancy, the town council shall elect by a majority vote of the town council
a recorder-treasurer to serve for the unexpired term the vacancy shall be
filled under § 14-42-103.
(c) When a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor in an incorporated
town, at the first regular meeting after the occurrence of the vacancy, the
town council shall:
(1) Elect by a majority vote of the council members a mayor to
serve the unexpired term; or
(2)(A) Call for a special election to be held under § 7-11-101
04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/9/25 HB1555
et seq. to fill the vacancy.
(B) At the special election, a mayor shall be elected to
complete the unexpired term the vacancy shall be filled under § 14-42-103.
(d) When a vacancy occurs in the office of marshal in an incorporated
town and the marshal was elected under § 14-45-109, at the first regular
meeting after the occurrence of the vacancy the town council shall elect by a
majority vote of the town council a marshal to serve for the unexpired term
vacancy shall be filled under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 14-47-113 is amended to read as follows:
14-47-113. Director Mayor or director vacancy.
Whenever a vacancy shall occur by any reason in the office of a
director, the board of directors shall elect a person by majority vote to
fill the vacancy and serve for the unexpired term thereof If a vacancy occurs
in the office of mayor or the office of a member of the board of directors,
the board of directors shall fill the vacancy under § 14-42-103 at the first
regular meeting after the vacancy occurs.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 14-47-117(b)(2)(A), concerning a vacancy
in the office of assistant mayor in a city manager form of government, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) If a vacancy in the office of mayor occurs, the assistant
mayor shall perform the duties of mayor until a successor mayor is elected or
appointed under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 14-47-117(b)(2)(B)(i), concerning a
vacancy in the office of assistant mayor in a city manager form of
government, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) If the mayor shall be continuously absent or
disabled for more than six (6) months, his or her office will automatically
become vacant and a successor mayor shall be elected or appointed under § 14-
42-103.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 14-48-112(b)(2)(A), concerning a vacancy
in the office of assistant mayor or vice mayor in a city administrator form
of government, is amended to read as follows:
04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/9/25 HB1555
(2)(A) If a vacancy in the office of mayor occurs, the assistant
mayor or vice mayor shall perform the duties of mayor until a successor mayor
is elected or appointed under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 14-48-112(b)(2)(B)(i), concerning a
vacancy in the office of assistant mayor or vice mayor in a city
administrator form of government, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) If the mayor is continuously absent or disabled for
more than six (6) months, his or her office will automatically become vacant,
and a successor mayor shall be elected or appointed under § 14-42-103.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 14-48-115 is amended to read as follows:
14-48-115. Mayor or director vacancy.
In the case of a vacancy in the office of mayor or in the office of a
member of the board of directors, the board, at the first regular meeting
after the occurrence of the vacancy and by majority vote, shall appoint a
person or call for a special election to be held in accordance with § 7-11-
101 et seq. to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term fill
the vacancy under § 14-42-103.

/s/Painter















04-09-2025 18:26:22 SSS175